Oklahoma, session 2026, SB863.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1290.14, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 156, O.S.L. 2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 1290.14), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1290.14.
SAFETY AND TRAINING COURSE
A. Each applicant for a license to carry a concealed or
unconcealed handgun pursuant to the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act must
successfully complete a firearms safety and training course in this
state conducted by a registered and approved firearms instructor as
provided by pursuant to the provisions of this section or from an
interactive online firearms safety and training course available
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB863 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

elec tronically via the Internet that is approved and certified by
the Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training (CLEET). The
applicant must further demonstrate competence and qualification with
an authorized pistol to carry as a concealed or unconcealed handgun
pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act, except
certain persons may be exempt from such training requirement as
provided by pursuant to the provisions of Section 1290.15 of this
title.
B. The Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training
(CLEET) shall establish criteria for approving firearms instructors
and interactive online firearms safety and training courses
available electronically via the Internet for purposes of training
and qualifying individuals for a handgun license pursuant to the
provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act. Prior to submitting an
application for CLEET approval as a firearms instructor, applicants
shall attend a firearms instructor school, meeting the following
minimum requirements:
1. Firearms instructor training conducted by one of the
following entities:
a. Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training,
b. National Rifle Association,
c. Oklahoma Rifle Association,
d. federal law enforcement agencies, or
e. other professionally recognized organizations;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB863 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. The course shall be at least sixteen (16) hours in length;
3. Upon completion of the course, the applicant shall be
qualified to provide instruction on pistols; and
4. Receive a course completion certificate.
All firearms instructors shall be required to meet the
eligibility requirements for a handgun license as provided in
Sections 1290.9, 1290.10, and 1290.11 of this title and the
application shall be processed as provided for applicants in Section
1290.12 of this title, including the state and national criminal
history records search and fingerprint search. A firearms
instructor shall be required to pay a fee of One Hundred Dollars
($100.00) to the Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training
(CLEET) each time the person makes application for CLEET approval as
a firearms instructor pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma
Self-Defense Act. The fee shall be retained by CLEET and shall be
deposited into the Firearms Instructors Revolving Fund. CLEET shall
promulgate the rules, forms, and procedures necessary to implement
the approval of firearms instructors as authorized by the provisions
of this subsection. CLEET shall periodically review each approved
instructor during a training and qualification course to assure
compliance with the rules and course contents. Any violation of the
rules may result in the revocation or suspension of CLEET and
Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation approval. Unless the
approval has been revoked or suspended, a firearms instructor’s
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB863 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

CLEE T approval shall be for a term of five (5) years. CLEET shall
be responsible for notifying all approved firearms instructors of
statutory and policy changes related to the Oklahoma Self-Defense
Act. A firearms instructor shall not be required to submit his or
her fingerprints for a fingerprint search when renewing a firearms
instructor’s CLEET approval.
C. 1. All firearms instructors approved by CLEET to train and
qualify individuals for a handgun license shall be required to apply
for registration with the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation
after receiving CLEET approval. All firearms instructors teaching
the approved course for a handgun license must display their
registration certificate during each training and qualification
course. Each approved firearms instructor shall complete a
registration form provided by the Bureau and shall have the option
to pay a registration fee of either One Hundred Dollars ($100.00)
for a five-year registration certificate or Two Hundred Dollars
($200.00) for a ten-year registration certificate to the Bureau at
the time of each application for registration, except as provided in
paragraph 2 of this subsection. Registration certificates issued by
the Bureau shall be valid for a period of five (5) years or ten (10)
years from the date of issuance. The Bureau shall issue a five-year
or ten-year handgun license to an approved firearms instructor at
the time of issuance of a registration certificate and no additional
fee shall be required or charged. The Bureau shall maintain a
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB863 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

curr ent listing of all registered firearms instructors in this
state. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to eliminate
the requirement for registration and training with CLEET as provided
in subsection B of this section. Failure to register or be trained
as required shall result in a revocation or suspension of the
instructor certificate by the Bureau.
2. Registered instructors listed in subparagraphs a and b of
this paragraph shall not be required to renew the firearms
instructor registration certificate with the Oklahoma State Bureau
of Investigation at the expiration of the registration term,
provided the instructor is not subject to any suspension or
revocation of the firearms instructor certificate. The firearms
instructor registration with the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation shall automatically renew together with the handgun
license authorized in paragraph 1 of this subsection for an
additional five-year term and no additional cost or fee may be
charged for the following individuals:
a. an active duty law enforcement officer of this state
or any of its political subdivisions or of the federal
government who has a valid CLEET approval as a
firearms instructor pursuant to the Oklahoma Self-
Defense Act, and
b. a retired law enforcement officer authorized to carry
a firearm pursuant to Section 1289.8 of this title who
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB863 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

has a valid CLEET approval as a firearms instructor
pursuant to the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act.
D. The Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation shall approve
registration for a firearms instructor applicant who is in full
compliance with CLEET rules regarding firearms instructors and the
provisions of subsection B of this section, if completion of the
federal fingerprint search is the only reason for delay of
registration of that firearms instructor applicant. Upon receipt of
the federal fingerprint search information, if the Bureau receives
information which precludes the person from having a handgun
license, the Bureau shall revoke both the registration and the
handgun license previously issued to the firearms instructor.
E. The required firearms safety and training course and the
actual demonstration of competency and qualification required of the
applicant shall be designed and conducted in such a manner that the
course can be reasonably completed by the applicant within an eight-
hour period. CLEET shall establish the course content and
promulgate rules, procedures, and forms necessary to implement the
provisions of this subsection. For the training and qualification
course, an applicant may be charged a fee which shall be determined
by the instructor or entity that is conducting the course. The
maximum class size shall be determined by the instructor conducting
the course; provided, however, practice shooting sessions shall not
have more than ten participating students at one time. CLEET may
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB863 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

esta blish criteria for assistant instructors and any other
requirements deemed necessary to conduct a safe and effective
training and qualification course. The course content shall include
a safety inspection of the firearm to be used by the applicant in
the training course; instruction on pistol handling, safety, and
storage; dynamics of ammunition and firing; methods or positions for
firing a pistol; information about the criminal provisions of the
Oklahoma law relating to firearms; the requirements of the Oklahoma
Self-Defense Act as it relates to the applicant; self-defense and
the use of appropriate force; a practice shooting session; and a
familiarization course. The firearms instructor shall refuse to
train or qualify any person when the pistol to be used or carried by
the person is either deemed unsafe or unfit for firing or is a
weapon not authorized by the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act. The course
shall provide an opportunity for the applicant to qualify himself or
herself with a pistol; provided, no pistol shall be capable of
firing larger than .45 caliber ammunition. Any applicant who
successfully trains and qualifies himself or herself with a pistol
shall be approved by the firearms instructor on the training
certificate. Upon successful completion of the training and
qualification course, a certificate of training and a certificate of
competency and qualification shall be issued to each applicant who
successfully completes the course. The certificate of training and
certificate of competency and qualification shall comply with the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB863 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

form s established by CLEET and shall be submitted with an
application for a handgun license pursuant to the provisions of
paragraph 2 of subsection A of Section 1290.12 of this title. The
certificate of training and certificate of competency and
qualification issued to an applicant shall be valid for a period of
three (3) years.
F. There is hereby created a revolving fund for the Council on
Law Enforcement Education and Training (CLEET), to be designated the
“Firearms Instructors Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a
continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall
consist of all funds received for approval of firearms instructors
for purposes of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act. All funds received
shall be deposited to the fund. All monies accruing to the credit
of the fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended
by the Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training, for
implementation of the training and qualification course contents,
approval of firearms instructors and any other CLEET requirement
pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act or as
may otherwise be deemed appropriate by CLEET. Expenditures from the
fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer
against claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services for approval and
payment.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB863 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

G. Firearms instructors shall keep on file for a period of not
less than three (3) years a roster of each training class, the
safety test score of each individual, the caliber and the weapon
each individual used when qualifying and whether or not each
individual successfully completed the training course. Firearms
instructors shall be authorized to destroy all training documents
and records upon expiration of the three-year time period.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1290.18, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1290.18.
APPLICATION FORM CONTENTS
The application for a handgun license shall be completed upon
the sworn oath of the applicant as provided in paragraph 5 of
Section 1290.12 of this title. The application form shall be
provided by the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation and shall
contain the following information in addition to any other
information deemed relevant by the Bureau:
1. Applicant’s full legal name;
2. Applicant’s birth name, alias names or nicknames;
3. Applicant’s maiden name, if applicable;
4. County of residence;
5. Length of residency at the current address;
6. Previous addresses for the preceding three (3) years;
7. Place of birth;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB863 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

8. Date of birth;
9. Declaration of citizenship or alien or admission number for
a non-United-States citizen;
10. Race;
11. Weight;
12. Height;
13. Sex;
14. Color of eyes;
15. Current driver license number;
16. Military service number, if applicable;
17. Law enforcement identification numbers, if applicable;
18. Current occupation;
19. Authorized type or types of pistol for which the applicant
qualified as stated on the certificate of training or exemption of
training which shall be stated as either derringer, revolver,
semiautomatic pistol, or some combination of derringer, revolver and
semiautomatic pistol and the maximum ammunition capacity of the
firearm shall be .45 caliber;
20. An acknowledgment that the applicant desires a handgun
license as a means of lawful self-defense and self-protection and
for no other intent or purpose;
21. 20. A statement that the applicant has never been convicted
of any felony offense in this state, another state or pursuant to
any federal offense;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB863 SFLR Page 10
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

22. 21. A statement that the applicant has none of the
conditions which would preclude the issuing of a handgun license
pursuant to any of the provisions of Sections 1290.10 and 1290.11 of
this title and that the applicant further meets all of the
eligibility criteria required by Section 1290.9 of this title;
23. 22. An authorization for the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation to investigate the applicant and any or all records
relating to the applicant for purposes of approving or denying a
handgun license pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-
Defense Act;
24. 23. An acknowledgment that the applicant has reviewed the
Federal Bureau of Investigation Privacy Act Statement and the
Oklahoma Self-Defense Act and is knowledgeable about its provisions;
25. 24. A statement that the applicant is the identical person
who completed the firearms training course for which the original
training certificate is submitted as part of the application or a
statement that the applicant is the identical person who is exempt
from firearms training for which the original exemption certificate
is submitted as part of the application, whichever is applicable to
the applicant;
26. 25. A conspicuous warning that the application is executed
upon the sworn oath of the applicant and that any false or
misleading answer to any question or the submission of any false
information or documentation by the applicant is punishable by
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB863 SFLR Page 11
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

crim inal penalty as provided in paragraph 5 of Section 1290.12 of
this title;
27. 26. A signed verification that the contents of the
application are known to the applicant and are true and correct;
28. 27. Two separate places for the original signature of the
applicant;
29. 28. A place for attachment of a passport-sized photograph
of the applicant; and
30. 29. A place for the signature and verification of the
identity of the applicant by the sheriff or the sheriff’s designee.
Information provided by the person on an application for a
handgun license shall be confidential except to law enforcement
officers or law enforcement agencies.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1290.19, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1290.19.
LICENSE FORM
The handgun license shall be on a form prescribed by the
Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation and shall contain the
following information in addition to any other information deemed
relevant by the Bureau:
1. The full name of the person;
2. Current address;
3. County of residence;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB863 SFLR Page 12
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

4. Date of birth;
5. Weight;
6. Height;
7. Sex;
8. Race;
9. Color of eyes;
10. Handgun license identification number;
11. Expiration date of the handgun license; and
12. Date of issuance of the handgun license; and
13. Authorized pistol to be either: (D) derringer, (R)
revolver, (S) semiautomatic pistol, or some combination of
derringer, revolver and semiautomatic pistol as may be authorized by
the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act for which the person demonstrated
qualification pursuant to the certificate of training or an
exemption certificate.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1290.21, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1290.21.
REPLACEMENT LICENSE
A. In the event a handgun license becomes missing, lost,
stolen, or destroyed, the license shall be invalid, and the person
to whom the license was issued shall notify the Oklahoma State
Bureau of Investigation within thirty (30) days of the discovery of
the fact that the license is not in the possession of the licensee.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB863 SFLR Page 13
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

The person may obtain a substitute license upon furnishing a
notarized statement to the Bureau that the license is missing, lost,
stolen, or destroyed and paying a fifteen-dollar Fifteen Dollar
($15.00) replacement fee. During any period when a license is
missing, lost, stolen, or destroyed, the person shall have no
authority to carry a concealed or unconcealed handgun pursuant to
the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act. The Bureau shall,
upon receipt of the notarized statement and fee from the licensee,
issue a substitute license with the same expiration date within ten
(10) days of the receipt of the notarized statement and fee.
B. Any person who knowingly or intentionally carries a
concealed or unconcealed handgun pursuant to a handgun license
authorized and issued pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma
Self-Defense Act which is stolen shall, upon conviction, be guilty
of a felony punishable by a fine of Five Thousand Dollars
($5,000.00).
C. Any person having a valid handgun license pursuant to the
Oklahoma Self-Defense Act may carry any make or model of an
authorized pistol listed on the license, provided the type of pistol
shall not be other than the type or types listed on the license. A
person may complete additional firearms training for an additional
type of pistol during any license period and upon successful
completion of the training may request the additional type of pistol
be included on the license. The person shall submit to the Bureau a
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB863 SFLR Page 14
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

fift een-dollar replacement fee, the original certificate of training
and qualification for the additional type of firearm, and a
statement requesting the license be updated to include the
additional type of pistol. The Bureau shall issue an updated
license with the same expiration date within ten (10) days of the
receipt of the request. The person shall have no authority to carry
any additional type of pistol pursuant to the provisions of the
Oklahoma Self-Defense Act until the updated license has been
received by the licensee. The original license shall be destroyed
upon receipt of an updated handgun license.
D. A person may request during any license period an update for
a change of address or change of name by submitting to the Bureau a
fifteen-dollar Fifteen Dollar ($15.00) replacement fee, and a
notarized statement that the address or name of the licensee has
changed. The Bureau shall issue an updated license with the same
expiration date within ten (10) days of receipt of the request. The
original license shall be destroyed upon the receipt of the updated
handgun license.
SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON PUBLIC SAFETY
February 25, 2025 - DO PASS




SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB863 SFLR Page 15
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)